Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2875.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to read: START_STATUTE9-500.54. Prohibition on unmanned aircraft regulation; exceptions; definitions A. Except as otherwise provided by law, a city or town may not enact or adopt any ordinance, policy or rule that relates to the ownership or operation of an unmanned aircraft, unmanned aircraft system or commercial drone delivery system or otherwise engage in regulating the ownership or operation of an unmanned aircraft, unmanned aircraft system or commercial drone delivery system. Any ordinance, policy or rule that violates this subsection, whether enacted or adopted by the city or town before or after August 6, 2016, is void. b. This section does not: 1. Prohibit a city or town from enacting or adopting an ordinance or rule on any of the following: (a) operating or using a public unmanned aircraft that is owned by the city or town. (b) taking off or landing a model aircraft in a park or preserve that is owned by the city or town if either of the following applies: (i) There are other parks or preserves that are within the city or town and that are available for operating model aircraft. (ii) The city or town has only one park or preserve that is within the city or town. (c) land use approvals for taking off, docking and landing a commercial drone delivery system in an area zoned for residential use or WITHIN A one hundred fifty-foot radius of the outer boundary of the area zoned for residential use. (d) taking off, docking or landing a commercial drone delivery system from a city or town owned facility or property. 2. Prohibit a city or town from requiring or enforcing existing regulations that are not explicitly for an unmanned aircraft, unmanned aircraft system or a commercial drone delivery system. 3. Allow a city or town to withhold issuing a permit or approval for operating, taking off, docking or landing an unmanned aircraft, unmanned aircraft system or a commercial drone delivery system in an area that is not zoned for residential use. 4. LIMIT A CITY's OR TOWN'S AUTHORITY TO APPLY AND ENFORCE GENERALLY APPLICABLE ZONING, LAND USE, SITE PLAN, BUILDING, FIRE AND PUBLIC SAFETY REGULATIONS TO THE PHYSICAL LOCATION OF FACILITIES that are USED FOR TAKING OFF, DOCKING OR LANDING AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT OR COMMERCIAL DRONE DELIVERY SYSTEM WITHIN two and one-half miles OF A small, medium or LARGE HUB AIRPORT'S LATITUDE AND LONGITUDE AS RECORDED IN THE federal aviation administration'S MASTER AIRPORT RECORDS, if the REGULATIONS DO NOT GOVERN THE FLIGHT PATH, NAVIGATION OR OPERATION OF THE unmanned AIRCRAFT AND DO NOT HAVE THE EFFECT OF PROHIBITING COMMERCIAL DRONE DELIVERY SYSTEMS WITHIN THE JURISDICTION and if the commercial drone delivery system operator consults with the airport regarding the regulations. c. For the purposes of this section: 1. "commercial drone delivery system" means an unmanned aircraft system engaged in the delivering of goods via drone and is approved to operate for that purpose by the federal aviation administration. 2. "Model aircraft" means an unmanned aircraft that is: (a) capable of sustained flight in the atmosphere. (b) flown within the visual LINE of sight of the person operating the model aircraft. (c) flown for hobby or recreational purposes. 3. "Public unmanned aircraft" means an unmanned aircraft or unmanned aircraft system that is operated by a public agency for a government-related purpose. 4. "Unmanned aircraft" means an aircraft, including an aircraft commonly known as a drone, that is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft. 5. "Unmanned aircraft system" means an unmanned aircraft and associated elements, including any communication links and components that control the unmanned aircraft. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Title 11, chapter 2, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-256.31, to read: START_STATUTE11-256.31. Prohibition on unmanned aircraft; exceptions; definitions A. Except as otherwise provided by law, a county may not enact or adopt any ordinance, policy or rule that relates to the ownership or operation of an unmanned aircraft, unmanned aircraft system or commercial drone delivery system or otherwise engage in regulating the ownership or operation of an unmanned aircraft, an unmanned aircraft system or commercial drone delivery system. Any ordinance, policy or rule that violates this subsection, whether enacted or adopted by the county before or after August 6, 2016, is void. b. This section does not: 1. Prohibit a county from enacting or adopting an ordinance or rule on any of the following: (a) operating or using a public unmanned aircraft that is owned by the county. (b) taking off or landing a model aircraft in a park or preserve that is owned by the county if either of the following applies: (i) There are other parks or preserves that are within the county and that are available for operating model aircraft. (ii) The county has only one park or preserve that is within the county. (c) land use approvals for taking off, docking and landing a commercial drone delivery system in an area zoned for residential use or WITHIN A one hundred fifty-foot radius of the outer boundary of the area zoned for residential use. (d) taking off, docking or landing a commercial drone delivery system from a county owned facility or property. 2. Prohibit a county from requiring or enforcing existing regulations that are not explicitly for an unmanned aircraft, unmanned aircraft system or a commercial drone delivery system. 3. Allow a county to withhold issuing a permit or approval for operating, taking off, docking or landing an unmanned aircraft, unmanned aircraft system or a commercial drone delivery system in an area that is not zoned for residential use. 4. LIMIT A county'S AUTHORITY TO APPLY AND ENFORCE GENERALLY APPLICABLE ZONING, LAND USE, SITE PLAN, BUILDING, FIRE AND PUBLIC SAFETY REGULATIONS TO THE PHYSICAL LOCATION OF FACILITIES that are USED FOR TAKING OFF, DOCKING OR LANDING AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT OR COMMERCIAL DRONE DELIVERY SYSTEM WITHIN two and one-half miles OF A small, medium or LARGE HUB AIRPORT'S LATITUDE AND LONGITUDE AS RECORDED IN THE federal aviation administration'S MASTER AIRPORT RECORDS, if the REGULATIONS DO NOT GOVERN THE FLIGHT PATH, NAVIGATION OR OPERATION OF THE unmanned AIRCRAFT AND DO NOT HAVE THE EFFECT OF PROHIBITING COMMERCIAL DRONE DELIVERY SYSTEMS WITHIN THE JURISDICTION and if the commercial drone delivery system operator consults with the airport regarding the regulations. c. For the purposes of this section: 1. "commercial drone delivery system" means an unmanned aircraft system engaged in the delivering of goods via drone and is approved to operate for that purpose by the federal aviation administration. 2. "Model aircraft" means an unmanned aircraft that is: (a) capable of sustained flight in the atmosphere. (b) flown within the visual LINE of sight of the person operating the model aircraft. (c) flown for hobby or recreational purposes. 3. "Public unmanned aircraft" means an unmanned aircraft or unmanned aircraft system that is operated by a public agency for a government-related purpose. 4. "Unmanned aircraft" means an aircraft, including an aircraft commonly known as a drone, that is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft. 5. "Unmanned aircraft system" means an unmanned aircraft and associated elements, including any communication links and components that control the unmanned aircraft. END_STATUTE Sec. 3.3. Section 13-3729, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3729. Unlawful operation of model or unmanned aircraft; state preemption; classification; definitions A. It is unlawful for a person to operate a model aircraft or a civil unmanned aircraft if the operation: 1. Is prohibited by a federal law or regulation that governs aeronautics, including federal aviation administration regulations. 2. Interferes with a law enforcement, firefighter or emergency services operation. B. It is unlawful for a person to operate or use an unmanned aircraft or unmanned aircraft system to intentionally photograph or loiter over or near a critical facility in the furtherance of any criminal offense. C. Except as authorized by law, a city, town or county may not enact or adopt any ordinance, policy or rule that relates to the ownership or operation of an unmanned aircraft or unmanned aircraft system or otherwise engage in the regulation of the ownership or operation of an unmanned aircraft or an unmanned aircraft system. Any ordinance, policy or rule that violates this subsection, whether enacted or adopted by the city, town or county before or after August 6, 2016, is void. D. C. This section does not: 1. Apply to a person or entity that is authorized or allowed by the federal aviation administration to operate or use an unmanned aircraft system if the person's or entity's operation or use complies with the authorization granted to the person or entity or with federal aviation administration rules. 2. Prohibit a city, town or county from enacting or adopting ordinances or rules on the operation or use of a public unmanned aircraft that is owned by the city, town or county. 3. Prohibit a city, town or county from enacting or adopting ordinances or rules that regulate the takeoff or landing of a model aircraft in a park or preserve owned by the city, town or county if: (a) There are other parks or preserves that are within the city, town or county and that are available for model aircraft operation. (b) The city, town or county only has one park or preserve that is within the city, town or county. 4. 2. Apply to the operation of an unmanned aircraft, including a public unmanned aircraft, by a first responder as defined in section 36-661 while acting in the first responder's official capacity or an emergency worker while engaged in or supporting authorized emergency management activities or performing emergency functions pursuant to title 26, chapter 2. E. D. A violation of subsection B of this section is a class 6 felony, except that a second or subsequent violation is a class 5 felony. A violation of subsection A of this section is a class 1 misdemeanor. F. e. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Civil unmanned aircraft" means an unmanned aircraft or unmanned aircraft system that is operated by a person for any purpose other than strictly for hobby or recreational purposes, including commercial purposes, or in furtherance of or incidental to any business or media service or agency. 2. "Commercial purposes" means the use of an unmanned aircraft in return for financial compensation and includes aerial photography, aerial mapping or geospatial imaging. 3. "Critical facility" means any of the following: (a) A petroleum or alumina refinery. (b) A petroleum, chemical or rubber production, transportation, storage or processing facility. (c) A chemical manufacturing facility. (d) A water or wastewater treatment facility and water development, distribution or conveyance system, including a dam. (e) An electric generation facility, as defined in section 42-14156, and any associated substation or switchyard. (f) An electrical transmission or distribution substation. (g) An electrical transmission line of at least sixty-nine thousand volts. (h) An electronic communication station or tower. (i) An energy control center. (j) A distribution operating center. (k) A facility that transfers or distributes natural gas, including a compressor station, regulator station, city gate station or pressure limiting station or a liquefied natural gas facility or supplier tap facility. (l) Any railroad infrastructure or facility. (m) A federal, state, county or municipal court. (n) A public safety or emergency operation facility. (o) A federal, state, county or municipal jail or prison or other facility in which persons are incarcerated. (p) A federal or state military installation or facility. (q) A hospital that receives air ambulance services. 4. "Model aircraft" has the same meaning prescribed in section 336 of the FAA modernization and reform act of 2012 (P.L. 112-95), as amended means an unmanned aircraft that is: (a) capable of sustained flight in the atmosphere. (b) flown within the visual LINE of sight of the person operating the model aircraft. (c) flown for hobby or recreational purposes. 5. "Person" means a corporation, firm, partnership, association, individual or organization or any other group acting as a unit. 6. "Public unmanned aircraft" means an unmanned aircraft or unmanned aircraft system that is operated by a public agency for a government-related purpose. 7. "Unmanned aircraft" means an aircraft, including an aircraft commonly known as a drone, that is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft. 8. "Unmanned aircraft system" means an unmanned aircraft and associated elements, including any communication links and components that control the unmanned aircraft. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.